Missouri, session 2026, SB936.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 143.1160, RSMo, is repealed and one
new section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section
143.1160, to read as follows:
143.1160. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Account holder", the same meaning as that term is
defined in section 191.1603;
(2) "Deduction", an amount subtracted from the
taxpayer's Missouri adjusted gross income to determine
Missouri taxable income for the tax year in which such
deduction is claimed;
(3) "Eligible expenses", the same meaning as that term
is defined in section 191.1603;
(4) "Long-term dignity savings account", the same
meaning as that term is defined in section 191.1603;
(5) "Qualified beneficiary", the same meaning as that
term is defined in section 191.1603;
(6) "Taxpayer", any individual who is a resident of
this state and subject to the income tax imposed under this
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 936 2
chapter, excluding withholding tax imposed under sections
143.191 to 143.265.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2021, a taxpayer shall be allowed a deduction of one hundred
percent of a participating taxpayer's contributions to a
long-term dignity savings account in the tax year of the
contribution. Each taxpayer claiming the deduction under
this section shall file an affidavit with the income tax
return verifying the amount of their contributions. The
amount of the deduction claimed shall not exceed the amount
of the taxpayer's Missouri adjusted gross income for the tax
year that the deduction is claimed, and shall not exceed
four thousand dollars per taxpayer claiming the deduction,
or eight thousand dollars if married filing combined.
3. Income earned or received as a result of assets in
a long-term dignity savings account shall not be subject to
state income tax imposed under this chapter. The exemption
under this section shall apply only to income maintained,
accrued, or expended pursuant to the requirements of
sections 191.1601 to 191.1607, and no exemption shall apply
to assets and income expended for any other purpose. The
amount of the deduction claimed shall not exceed the amount
of the taxpayer's Missouri adjusted gross income for the tax
year the deduction is claimed.
4. If any deductible contributions to or earnings from
any such programs referred to in this section are
distributed and not used to pay for eligible expenses or are
not held for the minimum length of time under subsection 2
of section 191.1605, the amount so distributed shall be
added to the Missouri adjusted gross income of the account
holder or, if the account holder is not living, the
qualified beneficiary, in the year of distribution.

SB 936 3
5. The department of revenue shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2020, shall be invalid and void.
6. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the [new] program authorized
under this section shall automatically sunset on December
[thirty-first four years after August 28, 2020] 31, 2031,
unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program
authorized under this section shall automatically sunset on
December thirty-first four years after the effective date of
the reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which the program authorized under this section is sunset.
✓